Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1903
Distribution for promotional purposes prohibited.

(1) Manufacturers, wholesalers, or retailers, or their representatives, of smokeless tobacco products shall not distribute for promotional purposes.

(2) Evidence of distribution of smokeless tobacco products to the general public shall be prima facie evidence of distribution for promotional purposes.

Laws 1989, LB 48, § 3.